apertium-krl.krl.lexc
LEXICON VERB_KAČ/ČUO

0:ču  VERB_INF_O ;
0:čo  VERB_INF_MA ;
0:čo  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:o  VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:čotti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:čota VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:čot VERB_PCP_TU ;
0:o  VERB_PRES_BACK ;

LEXICON VERB_KAČ/ČOA

0:čo  VERB_INF_A ;
0:čo  VERB_INF_MA ;
0:čo  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:o  VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:čotti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:čota VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:čot VERB_PCP_TU ;
0:o  VERB_PRES_BACK ;

LEXICON VERB_KOROŠ/TOA

0:to  VERB_INF_A ;
0:ta  VERB_INF_EN ;
0:ta  VERB_INF_MA ;
0:ti  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:ši  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:šetti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:šeta VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:šet VERB_PCP_TU ;
0:ša  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:ta  VERB_PCP_N ;

LEXICON VERB_VALMIS/TOA

0:to  VERB_INF_A ;
0:ta  VERB_INF_EN ;
0:ta  VERB_INF_MA ;
0:ti  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:si  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:ta  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:setti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:seta VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:set VERB_PCP_TU ;
0:sa  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:ta  VERB_PCP_N ;

LEXICON VERB_TAH/TOA

0:to  VERB_INF_A ;
0:o  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:to  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:otti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:ota VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:ot VERB_PCP_TU ;
0:to VERB_PCP_N ;

LEXICON VERB_TAP/POA

0:po  VERB_INF_A ;
0:po  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:etti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:eta VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:et VERB_COND_PASSIVE_TAIS ;
0:et VERB_PCP_TU ;
0:t  VERB_PAST_BACK ;

LEXICON VERB_SOIT/TOA

0:to  VERB_INF_A ;
0:ta  VERB_INF_MA ;
0:ti  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:ta  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:a  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:ti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:etti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:eta VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:et VERB_COND_PASSIVE_TAIS ;
0:et VERB_PCP_TU ;
0:t  VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:ta VERB_PCP_N ;


LEXICON VERB_OT/TOA

0:to  VERB_INF_A ;
0:ti  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:a VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:a VERB_3SG_U ;
0:a VERB_IMPV ;
0:ta VERB_IMPVPL_BACK ;
0:etti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:eta VERB_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_TANŠŠI/E

0  VERB_INF_E ;
0  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:tti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_EČ/ČIE

0:či  VERB_INF_E ;
0:či  VERB_INF_MÄ ;
0:i  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:i  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:itti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;


LEXICON VERB_POIMI/E

0  VERB_INF_E ;
0  VERB_INF_MA ;
0  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:tti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_IT/KIE

0:ki  VERB_INF_E ;
0:ke  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:e  VERB_CONNEG_0 ;
0:ki  VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:ki  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:ketti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:ö   VERB_3SG_Y ;
0:ket  VERB_PCP_TY ;

LEXICON VERB_KITK/IE

0:i  VERB_INF_E ;
0:e  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:i  VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:itti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:ö   VERB_3SG_Y ;
0:et  VERB_PCP_TY ;

LEXICON VERB_LAŠ/KIE

0:ki  VERB_INF_E ;
0:e  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:i  VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:itti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:et  VERB_PCP_TU ;

LEXICON VERB_OP/PIE

0:pi  VERB_INF_E ;
0:i  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:itti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_ŠO/PIE

0:pi  VERB_INF_E ;
0:vi  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:pi  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:vitti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_TUN/TIE

0:ti  VERB_INF_E ;
0:ne  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:to  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:ti  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:netti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:neta   VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:t   VERB_COND ;

LEXICON VERB_LUA/TIE

0:ti  VERB_INF_E ;
0:ji  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:ti  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:jitti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:jita  VERB_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_TI/ETEÄ

0:ete  VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:ijetti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:ijet  VERB_PCP_TY ;
0:ijä  VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0:ijetä VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:ijet  VERB_COND_PASSIVE_TÄIS ;
0:etä  VERB_COND ;

LEXICON VERB_TÄYT/TYÄ

0:ty  VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:ti  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:ytti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:yt  VERB_PCP_TY ;

LEXICON VERB_NÄYT/TYÄ

0:ty  VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:ty  VERB_3SG_Y ;
0:ti  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:ty  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:ytä  VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:etti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:et  VERB_PCP_TY ;

LEXICON VERB_VIČER/TEÄ

0:te  VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:ti  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:retti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:retä  VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:ret  VERB_PCP_TY ;

LEXICON VERB_PIÄT/TEÄ

0:te  VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:tä  VERB_INF_MÄ ;
0:ä  VERB_CONNEG_0 ;
0:ä  VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0:e  VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0:tä  VERB_3SG_Y ;
0:ti  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:etti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:etä  VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:et  VERB_PCP_TY ;
0:tä  VERB_PCP_N ;

LEXICON VERB_TYÖN/TEÄ

0:te  VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:ti  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:netti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:netä  VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:net  VERB_PCP_TY ;

LEXICON VERB_LÖY/TEÄ

0:te  VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:si  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:s   VERB_PAST_FRONT ;
0:vä  VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0:vetti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:vetä  VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:vet  VERB_PCP_TÄVÄ ;
0:vet  VERB_PCP_TY ;

LEXICON VERB_JÄRJEŠ/TEÄ

0:te  VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:ti  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:tä  VERB_3SG_Y ;
0:šetti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:šetä  VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:šet  VERB_PCP_TY ;
0:šä   VERB_PCP_N ;

LEXICON VERB_PI/TYÄ

0:ty  VERB_INF_Ä ;

LEXICON VERB_EL/EÄ

0:e  VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:ä  VERB_3SG_Y ;
0:ä  VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0:etä  VERB_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_OPAŠ/TUO

0:tu  VERB_INF_O ;
0:šo  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:to  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:šuta  VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:tu  VERB_PRES_BACK ;

LEXICON VERB_TOIV/UO

0:u  VERB_INF_O ;
0:o  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:o  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:ota  VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:utti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:o  VERB_PRES_BACK ;

LEXICON VERB_VOIT/TUA

0:tu  VERB_INF_A ;
0:tu  VERB_INF_AS ; 
0:tu  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:tu  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:tu  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:eta  VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:etti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:a  VERB_CONNEG_0 ;

LEXICON VERB_KAN/TUA

0:tu  VERB_INF_A ;
0:tu  VERB_INF_AS ; 
0:tu  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:tu  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:tu  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:na  VERB_CONNEG_0 ;

LEXICON VERB_RUA/TUO

0:tu   VERB_INF_O ;
0:ta   VERB_3SG_U ;
0      VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:va   VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:ta   VERB_INF_MA ;

LEXICON VERB_KUUL/UO

0:u  VERB_INF_O ;
0:u  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:u  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:u  VERB_PRES_BACK ;

LEXICON VERB_LOP/PUO

0:pu  VERB_INF_O ;
0:pu  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:pu  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:pu  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:pu  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;

LEXICON VERB_RYH/TYÖ

0:ty  VERB_INF_Ö ;
0:ty  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:ty  VERB_3SG_Y ;
0:ty  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:ytti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:yt  VERB_COND_PASSIVE_TÄIS ;

LEXICON VERB_ILMEŠ/TYÖ

0:ty  VERB_INF_Ö ;
0:ty  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:ty  VERB_3SG_Y ;
0:ty  VERB_PRES_BACK ;


LEXICON VERB_IS/TUO

0:tu  VERB_INF_O ;
0:su  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:tu  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:su  VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:tu  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:tu  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:sutti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_RIK/KUO

0:ku  VERB_INF_O ;
0:ko  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:ko  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:o  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:otti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_ROIK/KUO

0:ku  VERB_INF_O ;
0:ku  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:ku  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:u  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:utti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_SAT/TUO

0:tu  VERB_INF_O ;
0:tu  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:to  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:u  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:u  VERB_PCP_N ;

LEXICON VERB_KER/TUO

0:tu  VERB_INF_O ;
0:to  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:to  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:to  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:rotti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_ŠI/TUO

0:tu  VERB_INF_O ;
0:to  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:to  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:to  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:votti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_KUČ/ČUO

0:ču  VERB_INF_O ;
0:ču  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:uta  VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:u  VERB_PRES_BACK ;

LEXICON VERB_VAI/PUO

0:pu  VERB_INF_O ;
0:pu  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:pu  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:vu  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:pu  VERB_PCP_N ;
0:vut  VERB_PCP_TU ;

LEXICON VERB_KER/ÄTÄ

0:ä    VERB_INF_TÄ ;
0:äsi VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:ää  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:ätti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:äta VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:yä  VERB_INF_MÄ ;

LEXICON VERB_KER/ITÄ

0:i    VERB_INF_TÄ ;
0:kisi VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:kiä  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:itti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:it  VERB_PCP_TY ;
0:itä VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:yä  VERB_INF_MÄ ;

LEXICON VERB_N/ÄHÄ

0:äh    VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:äki VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:äv  VERB_PAST_FRONT ;
0:iä VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0:äe  VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0:ähti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:ähhä VERB_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_AV/ATA

0:a    VERB_INF_TA ;
0:a    VERB_INF_MA ;
0:asi VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:as VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:ua  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:ua  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:atti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:ata VERB_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB
aštuo%<vblex%>:ašt VERB_KUUL/UO ;
eččie%<vblex%>:eč  VERB_EČ/ČIE ;
ehottoa%<vblex%>:ehot  VERB_SOIT/TOA ;
eleä%<vblex%>:el   VERB_EL/EÄ ;
herättyä%<vblex%>:herät VERB_NÄYT/TYÄ ;
hokšata%<vblex%>:hokš  VERB_AV/ATA ;
hukkuo%<vblex%>:huk  VERB_ROIK/KUO ;
ilmeštyö%<vblex%>:ilmeš  VERB_ILMEŠ/TYÖ ;
innoššuttua%<vblex%>:innoššut VERB_VOIT/TUA ;
huoleššuttua%<vblex%>:huoleššut VERB_VOIT/TUA ;
istuo%<vblex%>:is  VERB_IS/TUO ;
itkie%<vblex%>:it  VERB_IT/KIE ;
koškie%<vblex%>:koš  VERB_IT/KIE ;
joutuo%<vblex%>:jout VERB_KUUL/UO ;
järješteä%<vblex%>:järješ  VERB_JÄRJEŠ/TEÄ ;
jätteä%<vblex%>:jät VERB_PIÄT/TEÄ ;
kačahtoa%<vblex%>:kačah  VERB_SOIT/TOA ;
kaččoa%<vblex%>:kač  VERB_KAČ/ČOA ;
kaččuo%<vblex%>:kač  VERB_KAČ/ČUO ;
kaimata%<vblex%>:kaim  VERB_AV/ATA ;
kantua%<vblex%>:kant VERB_KAN/TUA ;
kennie%<vblex%>:kenni VERB_TANŠŠI/E ;
keritä%<vblex%>:ker VERB_KER/ITÄ ;
kertuo%<vblex%>:ker  VERB_KER/TUO ;
kerätä%<vblex%>:ker VERB_KER/ÄTÄ ;
kiinnoššuttua%<vblex%>:kiinnoššut VERB_VOIT/TUA ;
kiinnoštoa%<vblex%>:kiinnoš VERB_KOROŠ/TOA ;
kiinnostuo%<vblex%>:kiinnost VERB_KUUL/UO ;
kiinitteä%<vblex%>:kiinit VERB_PIÄT/TEÄ ;
kitkie%<vblex%>:kitk  VERB_KITK/IE ;
kiušata%<vblex%>:kiuš  VERB_AV/ATA ;
koristoa%<vblex%>:koris VERB_VALMIS/TOA ;
koroštoa%<vblex%>:koroš VERB_KOROŠ/TOA ;
koroštoa%<vblex%>:koroš VERB_VALMIS/TOA ;
kuččuo%<vblex%>:kuč  VERB_KUČ/ČUO ;
kummekšie%<vblex%>:kummekši VERB_TANŠŠI/E ;
kuuluo%<vblex%>:kuul  VERB_KUUL/UO ;
käyttäytyö%<vblex%>:käyttäy  VERB_RYH/TYÖ ;
laškie%<vblex%>:laš VERB_LAŠ/KIE ;
liittyä%<vblex%>:liit VERB_NÄYT/TYÄ ;
liittyö%<vblex%>:liit VERB_ILMEŠ/TYÖ ;
lišäytyö%<vblex%>:lišäy  VERB_ILMEŠ/TYÖ ;
lopettoa%<vblex%>:lopet  VERB_SOIT/TOA ;
loppuo%<vblex%>:lop  VERB_LOP/PUO ;
luatie%<vblex%>:lua  VERB_LUA/TIE ;
lukie%<vblex%>:luki VERB_TANŠŠI/E ;
löyteä%<vblex%>:löy  VERB_LÖY/TEÄ ;
löyteä%<vblex%>:löy VERB_VIČER/TEÄ ;
löytyä%<vblex%>:löy VERB_PI/TYÄ ;
miellytteä%<vblex%>:miellyt VERB_PIÄT/TEÄ ;
muhie%<vblex%>:muhi VERB_TANŠŠI/E ;
noššattoa%<vblex%>:noššat VERB_VALMIS/TOA ;
noštoa%<vblex%>:noš VERB_VALMIS/TOA ;
nähä%<vblex%>:n VERB_N/ÄHÄ ;
näyttyä%<vblex%>:näyt VERB_NÄYT/TYÄ ;
näyttyä%<vblex%>:näyt VERB_NÄYT/TYÄ ;
opaštua%<vblex%>:opaš VERB_KAN/TUA ;
noštua%<vblex%>:noš VERB_KAN/TUA ;
opaštuo%<vblex%>:opaš  VERB_OPAŠ/TUO ;
oppie%<vblex%>:op VERB_OP/PIE ;
ošallistuo%<vblex%>:ošallis  VERB_IS/TUO ;
ottoa%<vblex%>:ot  VERB_OT/TOA ;
ottuo%<vblex%>:ot  VERB_IS/TUO ;
peitteä%<vblex%>:peit  VERB_PIÄT/TEÄ ;
pelaštoa%<vblex%>:pelaš VERB_KOROŠ/TOA ;
peluata%<vblex%>:pelu  VERB_AV/ATA ;
peruštoa%<vblex%>:peruš VERB_KOROŠ/TOA ;
pityä%<vblex%>:pi  VERB_PI/TYÄ ;
poimie%<vblex%>:poimi VERB_POIMI/E ;
rikkuo%<vblex%>:rik  VERB_RIK/KUO ;
roikkuo%<vblex%>:roik  VERB_ROIK/KUO ;
ruatuo%<vblex%>:rua VERB_RUA/TUO ;
ryhtyö%<vblex%>:ryh  VERB_RYH/TYÖ ;
šammuttua%<vblex%>:šammut VERB_VOIT/TUA ;
šanuo%<vblex%>:šan  VERB_TOIV/UO ;
šanuo%<vblex%>:šan  VERB_TOIV/UO ;
sattuo%<vblex%>:sat  VERB_SAT/TUO ;
šeisuo%<vblex%>:šeis  VERB_TOIV/UO ;
šelittyä%<vblex%>:šelit VERB_TÄYT/TYÄ ;
šituo%<vblex%>:šit  VERB_TOIV/UO ;
šituo%<vblex%>:ši  VERB_ŠI/TUO ;
šoittoa%<vblex%>:šoit  VERB_SOIT/TOA ;
šopie%<vblex%>:šo VERB_ŠO/PIE ;
šyntyö%<vblex%>:šyn  VERB_RYH/TYÖ ;
tahtoa%<vblex%>:tah  VERB_TAH/TOA ;
tappoa%<vblex%>:tap  VERB_TAP/POA ;
tarkistoa%<vblex%>:tarkis  VERB_VALMIS/TOA ;
tieteä%<vblex%>:ti VERB_TI/ETEÄ ;
tietyä%<vblex%>:tie VERB_PI/TYÄ ;
tiijuštua%<vblex%>:tiijuš VERB_KAN/TUA ;
toimie%<vblex%>:toimi VERB_TANŠŠI/E ;
toivuo%<vblex%>:toiv  VERB_TOIV/UO ;
tuntie%<vblex%>:tun  VERB_TUN/TIE ;
tuottoa%<vblex%>:tuot  VERB_SOIT/TOA ;
tuškistuo%<vblex%>:tuškist VERB_KUUL/UO ;
työnteä%<vblex%>:työn  VERB_TYÖN/TEÄ ;
täyttyä%<vblex%>:täyt VERB_TÄYT/TYÄ ;
uškuo%<vblex%>:uš  VERB_RIK/KUO ;
vaihtua%<vblex%>:vaih VERB_VOIT/TUA ;
vaipuo%<vblex%>:vai  VERB_VAI/PUO ;
valmistua%<vblex%>:valmis VERB_KAN/TUA ;
veikkuo%<vblex%>:veik  VERB_ROIK/KUO ;
vičerteä%<vblex%>:vičer VERB_VIČER/TEÄ ;
vietteä%<vblex%>:viet VERB_PIÄT/TEÄ ;
yhistyä%<vblex%>:yhis VERB_NÄYT/TYÄ ;
yhistäytyö%<vblex%>:yhistäy  VERB_ILMEŠ/TYÖ ;
yhtyö%<vblex%>:yh  VERB_RYH/TYÖ ;
